Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB357.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.592 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, pregnant women[,] and new
mothers up to twelve (12) months postpartum, regardless of citizenship or national
origin, and children up to age one (1) shall be eligible for participation in the
Kentucky Medical Assistance Program if:
(a) They have family income up to but not exceeding one hundred [and ]eighty-
five percent (185%) of the nonfarm income official poverty guidelines as
promulgated by the Department of Health and Human Services of the United
States as revised annually; and
(b) They are otherwise eligible for the program.
(2) The percentage established in subsection (1)(a) of this section may be increased to
the extent:
(a) Permitted under federal law; and
(b) Funding is available.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Eligible individual" means an individual who:
1. Is not pregnant;
2. Has a family combined income up to, but not exceeding, two hundred
sixty percent (260%) of the nonfarm income official poverty guidelines
as promulgated by the United States Department of Health and
Human Services; and
3. a. Is eligible for the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program; or
b. Would otherwise be eligible for the Kentucky Medical Assistance
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/14/2025 3:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1246
Program, except that the individual is not a citizen of the United
States and is not considered an eligible noncitizen pursuant to 8
U.S.C. sec. 1611 or 1612;
(b) "Family planning services" means all the following services, regardless of
an individual’s age, sex, or gender identity, or the age, sex, or gender
identity of the individual’s partner, including but not limited to:
1. All contraceptive drugs, devices, and other products approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration, including:
a. Over-the-counter contraceptive drugs, devices, and products;
and
b. A twelve (12) month supply of self-administered contraceptive
drugs, devices, and supplies, unless the individual requests a
smaller supply or the prescribing provider restricts the enrollee
to a smaller supply;
2. Voluntary sterilization procedures;
3. Activities that enable individuals to determine the number and spacing
of their children and to select the means by which this may be
achieved;
4. The consultations, examinations, and medical services that are
necessary to prescribe, dispense, insert, deliver, distribute, administer,
or remove contraceptive drugs, devices, and other products; and
5. Follow-up visits to evaluate or manage problems associated with
contraceptive drugs, devices, or products; and
(c) "Family planning-related services" means educational, medical, and social
services, including but not limited to:
1. Medically necessary evaluations or preventive services such as tobacco
utilization screening, counseling, testing, and cessation services;
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/14/2025 3:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1246
2. Cervical cancer screening and prevention;
3. Diagnosis of treatment of a sexually transmitted infection and
medication and supplies to prevent a sexually transmitted infection;
and
4. Any other medical diagnosis, treatment, or preventive service that is
routinely provided as part of a family planning visit.
(2) The cabinet shall establish a family planning program within the Department for
Medicaid Services to provide family planning services and family planning-
related services to eligible individuals.
(3) In administering this program, the cabinet shall not:
(a) Infringe upon an eligible individual’s choice of contraceptive drug, device,
or product by requiring prior authorization, step therapy, or other
utilization control techniques for medically appropriate contraceptive drugs,
devices, or products approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration;
(b) Impose any cost-sharing requirements for enrolled individuals; or
(c) Deny coverage based on the sex, sexual orientation, or gender identity of
the eligible individual, or the sex, sexual orientation, or gender identity of
the eligible individual’s partner.
(4) The Department for Medicaid Services shall:
(a) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A, and amend any contract with a managed care organization as is
necessary, to implement this section; and
(b) Collaborate with the Division of Health Benefit Exchange within the
cabinet, health care consumer advocates, family planning providers, and
other interested stakeholders to establish a comprehensive community
education and outreach campaign to provide culturally and linguistically
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/14/2025 3:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1246
accessible information to facilitate participation in the program, including
but not limited to enrollment procedures, program services, and benefit
utilization.
Section 3. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the Department for
Medicaid Services determines that a waiver or any other authorization from a federal
agency is necessary prior to the implementation of any provision of Sections 1 and 2 of
this Act, the cabinet or department shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this
Act, request the waiver or authorization and shall only delay full implementation of those
provisions for which a waiver or authorization was deemed necessary until the waiver or
authorization is granted.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/14/2025 3:46 PM Jacketed